Nebraska, session 109, LB608A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB608A LB608A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $781,647 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $1,351,495 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education, for
Program 692, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill
608, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$781,647 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $1,351,495 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
-2-